Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-885.23
Attorney General; special counsel; appoint; fees allowed; taxed as costs.

The Attorney General may appoint special counsel to prosecute the action as provided for in section 81-885.22, and all fees allowed to the receiver and to counsel so appointed shall be taxed as costs in such action as the court may direct.

Laws 1973, LB 68, § 23.